District of Columbia statutes.
9-1107.08

Mayor to enter agreements to make certain technical amendments; effective date of technical amendments.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia shall, for the District of Columbia, enter agreements with the Commonwealth of Virginia and the State of Maryland to make technical amendments to Title III of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact, so long as the amended version of the Compact then substantially conforms to the amendments in § 2 of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Compact Amendment Act of 1984. The technical amendments shall become effective when the Mayor executes the agreements concerning the Compact.

History

Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-122, § 3, 31 DCR 4049

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2437.1.

References in Text

The “Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Compact Amendment Act of 1984,” referred to at the end of the first sentence of this section, is D.C. Law 5-122.